District of Columbia statutes.
34-1312.11

Exemption from District taxes.

The imposition, collection, and receipt of DDOT Underground Electric Company Infrastructure Improvement Charges shall not be subject to taxation by the District.

May 3, 2014, D.C. Law 20-102, § 211, 61 DCR 1882

History